Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.060

Expanded function dental auxiliary—License—Reciprocity.

An applicant holding a license in another state may be licensed as an expanded function dental auxiliary in this state without examination if the commission determines that the other state's licensing standards are substantially equivalent to the standards in this state.

[ 2007 c 269 s 9.]